District of Columbia statutes.
19-311

Share of collateral relations.

After children, descendants, parents, brothers, and sisters of the deceased and their descendants, all collateral relations in equal degree share, and representation among the collaterals is not allowed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1981 Ed., § 19-311.
1973 Ed., § 19-311.